Montana, session 2025, HB630.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Limit on department rules. Department rules or regulations of a local
authority related to the regulation of greenhouse gas emissions or a calculation and application of the social
cost of carbon for the operation of a motor vehicle are not effective unless approved by the legislature at the
next legislative session.

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Limit on department rules. Commission rules related to the regulation
of greenhouse gas emissions or a calculation and application of the social cost of carbon are not effective
unless approved by the legislature at the next legislative session.

NEW SECTION. Section 3. Limit on department rules. Department rules related to the regulation of
greenhouse gas emissions or a calculation and application of the social cost of carbon are not effective unless
approved by the legislature at the next legislative session.

NEW SECTION. Section 4. Limit on department rules. Board rules related to the regulation of
greenhouse gas emissions or a calculation and application of the social cost of carbon are not effective unless
approved by the legislature at the next legislative session.

NEW SECTION. Section 5. Codification instruction. (1) [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an
integral part of Title 61, chapter 9, part 1, and the provisions of Title 61, chapter 9, part 1, apply to [section 1].
(2) [Section 2] is intended to be codified as an integral part of Title 69, chapter 1, part 1, and the
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 630

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 630.1
provisions of Title 69, chapter 1, part 1, apply to [section 2].
(3) [Section 3] is intended to be codified as an integral part of Title 75, chapter 2, part 1, and the
provisions of Title 75, chapter 2, part 1, apply to [section 3].
(4) [Section 4] is intended to be codified as an integral part of Title 82, chapter 11, part 1, and the
provisions of Title 82, chapter 11, part 1, apply to [section 4].
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 630